Maryland, session 2025, HB0667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0667*

HOUSE BILL 667
Article – General Provisions
1–111.
(a) In this Code and any regulation or directive adopted under it, “legal holiday”
means:
(1) January 1, for New Year’s Day;
(2) (i) January 15, for Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s birthday; or
(ii) if the United States Congress designates another day for
observance of Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s birthday, the day designated by the United
States Congress;
(3) February 12, for Lincoln’s birthday;
(4) the third Monday in February, for Washington’s birthday;
(5) March 25, for Maryland Day;
(6) Good Friday;
(7) (i) May 30, for Memorial Day; or
(ii) if the United States Congress designates another day for
observance of Memorial Day, the day designated by the United States Congress;
(8) June 19, for Juneteenth National Independence Day;
(9) July 4, for Independence Day;
(10) the first Monday in September, for Labor Day;
(11) September 12, for Defenders’ Day;
(12) (i) October 12, for Columbus Day; or
(ii) if the United States Congress designates another day for
observance of Columbus Day, the day designated by the United States Congress;
(13) NOVEMBER 1, FOR MARYLAND EMANCIPATION DAY;
[(13)] (14) November 11, for Veterans’ Day;
[(14)] (15) the fourth Thursday in November, for Thanksgiving Day;

HOUSE BILL 667 3
[(15)] (16) the Friday after Thanksgiving Day, for American Indian
Heritage Day;
[(16)] (17) December 25, for Christmas Day;
[(17)] (18) each statewide general election day in the State; and
[(18)] (19) each other day that the President of the United States or the
Governor designates for general cessation of business.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in the Code, a legal holiday shall be
observed on:
(1) the date specified in subsection (a) of this section; or
(2) if that date falls on a Sunday, on the next Monday after that date.
[7–420.
The Governor annually shall proclaim November 1 as Maryland Emancipation Day
in recognition of the emancipation of the slaves in the State.]
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
9–201.
In this title, “employee holiday” includes:
(1) January 1, for New Year’s Day;
(2) January 15, for Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s birthday, unless the
United States Congress designates another day for observance of that legal holiday, in
which case, the day designated by the United States Congress;
(3) the third Monday in February, for Presidents’ Day;
(4) May 30, for Memorial Day, unless the United States Congress
designates another day for observance of that legal holiday, in which case, the day
designated by the United States Congress;
(5) June 19, for Juneteenth National Independence Day;
(6) July 4, for Independence Day;
(7) the first Monday in September, for Labor Day;

HOUSE BILL 667
(8) October 12, for Columbus Day, unless the United States Congress
designates another day for observance of that legal holiday, in which case, the day
designated by the United States Congress;
(9) NOVEMBER 1, FOR MARYLAND EMANCIPATION DAY;
[(9)] (10) November 11, for Veterans’ Day;
[(10)] (11) the fourth Thursday in November, for Thanksgiving Day;
[(11)] (12) the Friday after Thanksgiving Day, for American Indian
Heritage Day;
[(12)] (13) December 25, for Christmas Day;
[(13)] (14) each statewide general election day in this State; and
[(14)] (15) each other day that the President of the United States or the
Governor designates for general cessation of business.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.